Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2207.32
Jurisdiction, defined.

Jurisdiction means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 24;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 76-2207.16;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 21.